District of Columbia statutes.
41-124

Filing of claim with Mayor for abandoned property.

Any person, excluding a state, claiming an interest in any property paid or delivered to the Mayor under this chapter may file a claim to the property or to the net proceeds from its sale. The claim must be on a form prescribed by the Mayor and must be verified by the claimant.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 124, 27 DCR 5150

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-224.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 24(a) of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).